Utah statutes.
78B-6-908.   Attorney fees.
(1)  In all cases of foreclosure when an attorney's fee is claimed by the
plaintiff, the amount shall be fixed by the court.  No other or greater amount
shall be allowed or decreed than the sum which shall appear by the evidence to
be actually charged by and to be paid to the attorney for the plaintiff.
(2)  If it shall appear that there is an agreement or understanding to divide
the fees between the plaintiff and his attorney, or between the attorney and
any other person except an attorney associated with him in the cause, the
defendant shall only be ordered to pay the amount to be retained by the
attorney or attorneys.
